Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 4. Change in Membership; Districts Under Prior Law

§ 721.
Inclusion of additional school districts.

Action initiated by district outside the union. After preliminary study by a district school board and approval by the State Board, and when a majority of voters present and voting at a school district meeting duly warned for that purpose vote to apply to a neighboring union school district for admission as a member of the union district, the vote shall be certified by the clerk of the school district to the clerk of the union school district and to the Secretary of Education. If, within two years from the date of that vote, a majority of those voting at a meeting of the union school district duly warned for that purpose votes to include the additional school district as a member of the union, the clerk of the union shall certify the results of that vote to the Secretary of Education. The Secretary of Education shall designate the additional school district a member of the union and so certify to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall record such certification in accordance with the provisions of section 706g of this title, which shall have the effect as provided in that section.

Action initiated by union school district. When it appears to the union board of directors that the boundaries of the union school district should be changed to include another school district, the union board shall submit a plan for incorporation of the other school district in the union district to the State Board. Following approval of the plan by the State Board, the union district directors shall insert an article fully describing the proposed change in the warning for a regular or special meeting of the union district. When a majority of the voters voting at the meeting vote to include an additional school district within the boundaries of the union school district as a member of the union, the board of directors shall notify the legislative branch of that additional district of the vote. Within 180 days thereafter, the legislative branch of the additional district proposed to be included shall duly warn a meeting thereof, setting forth in the warning the vote of the union district and the proposed change in its boundaries. If a majority of the voters voting at the meeting of the additional district vote to be included within the union school district, the result of that vote and the result of the vote already taken by the union school district shall be certified by the respective clerks to the Secretary of Education. The Secretary of Education and the Secretary of State shall then take the action specified in section 706g of this title.

A union school district enlarged pursuant to this section shall have all the powers and responsibilities given it by this subchapter. Unless otherwise agreed between the union district board and the additional member district school board, the additional member shall share in the expenses of the union district in the proportion provided in this subchapter for other member districts from the date the certificate of the Secretary of State is filed in the office of the clerk of the union district and the office of the clerk of the additional school district member.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 35; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 90, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 68.

§ 721a.
Withdrawal from district.

A school district that is a member of a union school district may vote to withdraw from the union school district if one year has elapsed since the union school district has become a body politic and corporate as provided in section 706g of this title.

When a majority of the voters of a school district that is a member of a union school district present and voting at a school district meeting duly warned for that purpose votes to withdraw from the union school district, the vote shall be certified by the clerk of the school district to the Secretary of State who shall record the certificate in his or her office and give notice of the vote to the Secretary of Education and to the other members of the union school district. Within 90 days after receiving notice, those other members shall vote by Australian ballot on the same day during the same hours whether to ratify withdrawal of the member. Withdrawal by a member shall be effective only if approved by an affirmative vote of each of the other members of the union school district.

If the vote to ratify the withdrawal of a member is approved by each of the other members, the union school district shall notify the Secretary of Education who shall advise the State Board. At a meeting held thereafter, if the State Board finds that the students in the withdrawing member will attend a school that is in compliance with the rules adopted by the Board pertaining to educational programs, then the State Board shall declare the membership of the withdrawing member in the union school district to end as of July 1 immediately following or as soon thereafter as the obligations of the withdrawing member have been paid to, or an agreement made with, the union school district in an amount satisfactory to the electorate of each member of the union school district. The State Board shall give notice to the remaining members in the union of its meeting and give representatives of the remaining members an opportunity to be heard. It shall then determine whether it is in the best interests of the State, the students, and the members remaining in the union district for the union to continue to exist. The State Board may declare the union district dissolved as of July 1 immediately following or as soon thereafter as each member’s obligations have been satisfied, or it may declare that the union district shall continue to exist despite the withdrawal of the former member. The State Board shall file the declaration with the Secretary of State, the clerk of the withdrawing member, and the clerk of the union school district concerned.

A vote of withdrawal taken after a union school district has become a body politic and corporate as provided in section 706g of this title, but less than one year after that date, shall be void.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 36; amended

1977, No. 7

;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2009, No. 44

, § 11, eff. May 21, 2009;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 91, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 721b.
Districts established under prior law.

All union school districts formed prior to July 1, 2007 are ratified and shall be governed by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 37; amended

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 30.

§ 721c.
Districts not operating schools.

At a duly warned meeting, the electorate of a district that does not operate schools and is a member of a union school district or districts representing all grades K-12 may vote to discontinue the district.
The powers and responsibilities of districts discontinued in this fashion shall be assigned to the union district of which it is a member.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 722.
Unified union districts.

A union school district shall be known as a unified union district if it provides for the education of resident prekindergarten-grade 12 students, whether by:

operating a school or schools for all grades;

operating a school or schools for all students in one or more grades and paying tuition for all students in the remaining grade or grades; or

paying tuition for all grades.

On the date the unified union district becomes operative, unless another date is specified in the study committee report, it shall supplant all other school districts within its borders, and they shall cease to exist.

If provided for in the committee report, the unified union school district board may be elected and may conduct business for the limited purpose of preparing for the transition to unified union district administration while the proposed member school districts continue to operate schools.

The functions of the legislative branch of each preexisting school district in warning meetings and conducting elections of unified union school district board members shall be performed by the corresponding board of alderpersons of a city or city council, the selectboard of a town, or the trustees of an incorporated school district, as appropriate.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 50; amended

1977, No. 107

;

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 112, eff. July 1, 1999;

2003, No. 76

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. Feb. 17, 2004;

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2015, No. 46

, § 44, eff. June 2, 2015.

§ 723.
Transition to unified union school district administration.

On the day the establishment of a unified union school district becomes effective, the district gains title to the assets and assumes the existing contractual obligations and other liabilities of the member school districts within its borders unless otherwise agreed to by the member districts in the approved plan for the formation of the unified union school district; provided, however, the unified union school district shall in all cases assume the contractual obligations of the member districts regarding each existing collective bargaining agreement or other employment contract until the agreement’s or contract’s expiration. All trust funds held or enjoyed by a preexisting district shall be held and applied as the terms of the trust indicate. If such trust allows, the funds may be applied for the use of the unified union school district. Within five days of the day a unified union school district becomes effective, the treasurer of each preexisting school district shall pay by check to the treasurer of the unified union school district the full amount of the balance standing in his or her school account and transfer to him or her all outstanding notes and contracts in force. All other officers of the preexisting school districts shall transfer to the corresponding officer of the unified union school district all instruments and other documents giving evidence of the assets, liabilities, and contractual status of the district.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 51; amended

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 724.
Withdrawal from or dissolution of a unified union school district.

A town or city corresponding to a preexisting school district that voted to form a unified union school district may vote to withdraw from the district if one year has elapsed since the unified union school district became a body politic and corporate as provided under section 706g of this title.

When a majority of the voters of the town or city present and voting at a meeting duly warned for that purpose votes to withdraw from a unified union school district, the vote shall be certified by the clerk of the town or city to the Secretary of State who shall record the certificate in his or her office and give notice of the vote to the other towns or cities corresponding to the preexisting school districts that voted to form the unified union school district. Such other towns and cities shall vote by Australian ballot on the same day during the same hours whether to ratify the withdrawal of the town or city. To be effective, action to withdraw shall be approved by an affirmative vote of each of the other towns or cities within the unified union school district.

If the vote to ratify the withdrawal of the town or city is approved by each of the other towns or cities, the unified union school district clerk shall notify the Secretary of Education who shall advise the State Board. At a meeting held thereafter, if the State Board finds that the students in the withdrawing town or city will attend a school that is in compliance with the rules adopted by the State Board pertaining to educational programs, the State Board shall declare the membership of the withdrawing town or city to be at an end as of July 1 immediately following or as soon thereafter as the obligations of the withdrawing district have been paid to, or an agreement made with, the union school district in an amount satisfactory to the electorate of each of the other towns and cities within the unified union school district. In addition, the State Board shall declare the preexisting school district corresponding to the withdrawing town or city to be reconstituted. The State Board shall give notice to the remaining towns and cities in the unified union school district of its meeting and give the relevant representatives an opportunity to be heard. It shall then determine whether it is in the best interests of the State, the students, and the school districts remaining in the unified union school district that the unified union district continue to exist. The State Board may declare the unified union school district dissolved as of July 1 immediately following or as soon thereafter as each remaining town’s or city’s obligations have been satisfied, or it may declare that the unified union district shall continue to exist despite the withdrawal of the former town or city member. The State Board shall file its declaration with the Secretary of State, the clerk of the withdrawing town or city, and the clerk of the affected unified union school district.

A vote of withdrawal taken after a unified union school district has become a body politic and corporate as provided in section 706g of this title but less than one year after that date is void.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 33; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 92, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.